test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TI-kîsihtâw_gt-norm.yaml
      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: ka-kîsihtâyân   # I will complete something, I will finish something, I will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [ka-kîsihtâyan, ka-kîsihtâyin]   # you will complete something, you will finish something, you will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ka-kîsihtât   # he/she will complete something, he/she will finish something, he/she will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: ka-kîsihtâyâhk   # we will complete something, we will finish something, we will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: ka-kîsihtâyahk   # we and you will complete something, we and you will finish something, we and you will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: ka-kîsihtâyîk   # you all will complete something, you all will finish something, you all will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: [ka-kîsihtâcik, ka-kîsihtâtwâw]   # they will complete something, they will finish something, they will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ka-kîsihtâthit   # another/others will complete something, another/others will finish something, another/others will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+X: [ka-kîsihtâniwik, ka-kîsihtâniwahk, ka-kîsihtâhk]   # someone will complete something, someone will finish something, someone will finish work on something
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: ta-kîsihtâyân   # I complete something, I finish something, I finish work on something
      PV/ta+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [ta-kîsihtâyan, ta-kîsihtâyin]   # you complete something, you finish something, you finish work on something
      PV/ta+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ta-kîsihtât   # he/she completes something, he/she finishes something, he/she finishes work on something
      PV/ta+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: ta-kîsihtâyâhk   # we complete something, we finish something, we finish work on something
      PV/ta+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: ta-kîsihtâyahk   # we and you complete something, we and you finish something, we and you finish work on something
      PV/ta+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: ta-kîsihtâyîk   # you all complete something, you all finish something, you all finish work on something
      PV/ta+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: [ta-kîsihtâcik, ta-kîsihtâtwâw]   # they complete something, they finish something, they finish work on something
      PV/ta+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ta-kîsihtâthit   # another/others complete something, another/others finish something, another/others finish work on something
      PV/ta+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+X: [ta-kîsihtâniwik, ta-kîsihtâniwahk, ta-kîsihtâhk]   # someone completes something, someone finishes something, someone finishes work on something
      

      # Fut # Cond
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: kîsihtâyâni   # when I complete something, when I finish something, when I finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: [kîsihtâyani, kîsihtâyini]   # when you complete something, when you finish something, when you finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: kîsihtâci   # when he/she completes something, when he/she finishes something, when he/she finishes work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: kîsihtâyâhki   # when we complete something, when we finish something, when we finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: kîsihtâyahki   # when we and you complete something, when we and you finish something, when we and you finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: kîsihtâyîko   # when you all complete something, when you all finish something, when you all finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: kîsihtâtwâwi   # when they complete something, when they finish something, when they finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: kîsihtâthici   # when another/others complete something, when another/others finish something, when another/others finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+X: [kîsihtâhki, kîsihtâhkwâwi]   # when someone completes something, when someone finishes something, when someone finishes work on something
      

      # Imp # Imm
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: kîsihtâ   # (you) complete something now, (you) finish something now, (you) finish work on something now
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: kîsihtâtân   # let you and us complete something now, let you and us finish something now, let you and us finish work on something now
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: kîsihtâk   # (you all) complete something now, (you all) finish something now, (you all) finish work on something now
      

      # Imp # Del
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Sg: kîsihtâhkan   # (you) complete something later, (you) finish something later, (you) finish work on something later
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Imp+Del+12Pl: kîsihtâhkahk   # let you and us complete something later, let you and us finish something later, let you and us finish work on something later
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Pl: kîsihtâhkîk   # (you all) complete something later, (you all) finish something later, (you all) finish work on something later
      
